Hawaii statutes.
§660-28 Bail, etc., before judgment.
Except as otherwise provided:

(1) Until judgment is given, the court may remand the
party or accept bail for the party's appearance from day to day or may place
the party under special care and custody, as circumstances may require; and

(2) After judgment is given, an order made by the
court under paragraph (1) shall be continued in effect during a stay of
enforcement of judgment, unless the trial court, the intermediate appellate
court, or the supreme court after taking of the appeal, terminates the order or
makes other provision in the circumstances. [L 1870, c 32, §25; am L 1923, c
217, §1; RL 1925, §2751; RL 1935, §4336; RL 1945, §10377; RL 1955, §239-28; HRS
§660-28; am L 1972, c 90, §5(q); gen ch 1985; am L 2004, c 202, §72; am L 2006,
c 94, §1; am L 2010, c 109, §1]

Case Notes

Granting of bail discretionary. 18 H. 473 (1907).

Pending return, custody of petitioner remains undisturbed.
26 H. 363, 367 (1922).

After judgment and pending perfection of appeal, authority
over custody of child. 26 H. 701 (1923).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next